West Virginia, session 2025, HB2610.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 10. FEES AND OTHER MONEY COLLECTED AT STATE INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION. §18B-10-7e. Tuition waivers for service-connected disabled veterans and their dependents. (a) The purpose of this section is to require state institutions of higher education, as well as community and technical colleges, to provide a waiver of tuition and fees for military veterans, their spouses, and their dependents, so long as that military veteran has a service-related disability of 50 percent or greater, as based on the Veterans Administration Schedule for Rating Disabilities (VASRD).(b) For every eligible veteran who is enrolled or will be enrolled as an undergraduate student, the agreement shall provide for a waiver of the cost of tuition and mandatory fees, as well as any eligible veteran who is or will be enrolled in a graduate or professional program.(c) "Eligible veteran" means any individual who satisfies the 50 percent disability threshold.